Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3717
Motor club representative; director; issue cease and desist order; revoke or suspend authority; hearing.

Upon satisfactory evidence that a club representative has violated or failed to comply with any provision of the Motor Club Services Act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated under such act, the director may issue an order requiring the club representative to cease and desist from engaging in such violation. After a hearing and for good cause shown, the director may revoke or suspend the club representative's authority.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 17;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 239.